Missouri, session 2026, SB1021.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 361.170, 361.749, 364.020, 364.030,
364.105, 365.030, 367.110, 367.120, 367.130, 367.140, 367.160,
367.170, 367.190, 367.509, 407.640, 408.500, and 436.570, RSMo,
are repealed and fifteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof,
to be known as sections 361.170, 361.749, 364.020, 364.030,
364.105, 365.030, 367.110, 367.140, 367.160, 367.170, 367.190,
367.509, 407.640, 408.500, and 436.570, to read as follows:
361.170. 1. The expense of every regular and every
special examination, together with the expense of
administering the banking laws, including salaries, travel
expenses, supplies and equipment, and including the direct
and indirect expenses for rent and other supporting services
furnished by the state, shall be paid by the banks and trust
companies of the state, and for this purpose the director
shall, prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, make an
estimate of the expenses to be incurred by the division
during such fiscal year. To this there shall be added an
amount not to exceed fifteen percent of the estimated
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1021 2
expenses to pay the costs of rent and other supporting
services such as the costs related to the division's
services from the state auditor and attorney general and an
amount sufficient to cover the cost of fringe benefits
furnished by the state. From this total amount the director
shall deduct the estimated amount of the anticipated annual
income to the fund from all sources other than bank or trust
company assessments. The director shall allocate and assess
the remainder to the several banks and trust companies in
the state on the basis of a weighted formula to be
established by the director, which will take into
consideration their total assets, as reflected in the last
preceding report called for by the director pursuant to the
provisions of section 361.130 or from information obtained
pursuant to subsection 3 of section 361.130 and, for trust
companies which do not take deposits or make loans, the
volume of their trust business, and the relative cost, in
salaries and expenses, of examining banks and trust
companies of various size and this calculation shall result
in an assessment for each bank and trust company which
reasonably represents the costs of the division of finance
incurred with respect to such bank or trust company. A
statement of such assessment shall be sent by the director
to each bank and trust company on or before July first. One-
half of the amount so assessed to each bank or trust company
shall be paid by it to the state director of the department
of revenue on or before July fifteenth, and the remainder
shall be paid on or before January fifteenth of the next
year.
2. Any expenses incurred or services performed on
account of any bank, trust company or other corporation
subject to the provisions of this chapter, outside of the

SB 1021 3
normal expense of any annual or special examination, shall
be charged to and paid by the corporation for whom they were
incurred or performed. Fees and charges to other
corporations subject to this chapter should be reviewed at
least annually by the division of finance to determine
whether regulatory costs are offset by the fees and charges,
and the director of the division of finance shall revise
fees and charges to fully recover these costs.
3. The director of the division of finance shall
prepare and maintain an equitable salary schedule for
examiners, professional staff, and support personnel who are
employees of the division. Personnel employed by the
division shall be compensated according to this schedule,
provided that such expense of administering the banking laws
is assessed and paid in accordance with this section. The
positions and classification plan for such personnel
attributed to the examination of the state bank and trust
companies shall allow for a comparison of such positions
with similar bank examiner positions at federal bank
regulatory agencies. State bank examiner positions shall
not be compensated more than ninety percent of parity for
corresponding federal positions for similar geographic
locations in Missouri as determined by the director of the
division of finance.
4. The state treasurer shall credit such payments to a
special fund to be known as the "Division of Finance Fund",
which is hereby created and which shall be devoted solely to
the payment of expenditures actually incurred by the
division and attributable to the regulation of banks, trust
companies, and other corporations subject to the
jurisdiction of the division. Any amount, other than the
amount not to exceed fifteen percent for supporting services

SB 1021 4
and the amount of fringe benefits described in subsection 1
of this section, remaining in such fund at the end of any
fiscal year and any earnings attributed to such fund shall
not be transferred and placed to the credit of the general
revenue fund as provided in section 33.080, but shall be
applicable by appropriation of the general assembly to the
payment of such expenditures of the division in the
succeeding fiscal year and shall be applied by the division
to the reduction of the amount to be assessed to banks and
trust companies in such succeeding fiscal year; provided the
amount not to exceed fifteen percent for supporting services
and the amount of fringe benefits described in subsection 1
of this section shall be returned to general revenue to the
extent supporting services are not directly allocated to the
fund.
5. There is hereby created in the state treasury the
"Consumer Licensing Fund" which shall consist of all fees
designated to be deposited into the fund by law. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance
with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund
and moneys in the fund shall be used solely by the division
of finance for the purposes of paying for all costs incurred
by the director in administering the provisions of law
100 assigned to the division of finance not otherwise required
101 to be deposited to the "division of finance fund", the
102 "residential mortgage licensing fund", or the "division of
103 savings and loan supervision fund". Notwithstanding the
104 provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
105 remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
106 revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
107 treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner

SB 1021 5
108 as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
109 on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
361.749. 1. As used in this section, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Consumer", any individual;
(2) "Consumer-directed wage access services", the
business of offering or providing earned wage access
services directly to a consumer based on the consumer's
representation and the provider's reasonable determination
of the consumer's earned but unpaid income;
(3) "Director", the director of the division of
finance within the department of commerce and insurance;
(4) "Division", the Missouri division of finance
within the department of commerce and insurance;
(5) "Earned but unpaid income", salary, wages,
compensation, or other income that a consumer or an employer
has represented, and that a provider has reasonably
determined, has been earned or has accrued to the benefit of
the consumer in exchange for the consumer's provision of
services to the employer or on behalf of the employer,
including on an hourly, project-based, piecework, or other
basis and including where the consumer is acting as an
independent contractor of the employer, but has not, at the
time of the payment of proceeds, been paid to the consumer
by the employer;
(6) "Earned wage access services", the business of
providing consumer-directed wage access services, employer-
integrated wage access services, or both;
(7) "Employer":
(a) A person who employs a consumer; or

SB 1021 6
(b) Any other person who is contractually obligated to
pay a consumer earned but unpaid income in exchange for a
consumer's provision of services to the employer or on
behalf of the employer, including on an hourly, project-
based, piecework, or other basis and including where the
consumer is acting as an independent contractor with respect
to the employer.
"Employer" does not include a customer of an employer or any
other person whose obligation to make a payment of salary,
wages, compensation, or other income to a consumer is not
based on the provision of services by that consumer for or
on behalf of such person;
(8) "Employer-integrated wage access services", the
business of delivering to consumers access to earned but
unpaid income that is based on employment, income, and
attendance data obtained directly or indirectly from an
employer;
(9) "Fee":
(a) A fee imposed by a provider for delivery or
expedited delivery of proceeds to a consumer;
(b) A subscription or membership fee imposed by a
provider for a bona fide group of services that includes
earned wage access services; or
(c) An amount paid by an employer to a provider on a
consumer's behalf, which entitles the consumer to receive
proceeds at reduced or no cost to the consumer.
A voluntary tip, gratuity, or donation shall not be deemed a
fee;

SB 1021 7
(10) "Outstanding proceeds", a payment of proceeds to
a consumer by a provider that has not yet been repaid to
that provider;
(11) "Person", a partnership, corporation,
association, sole proprietorship, limited liability company,
or nonprofit or governmental entity;
(12) "Proceeds", a payment of funds to a consumer by a
provider that is based on earned but unpaid income;
(13) "Provider", a person who is in the business of
offering and providing earned wage access services to
consumers.
2. (1) No person shall engage in the business of
earned wage access services in this state without first
[registering] obtaining a license to act as an earned wage
access services provider with the division.
(2) [The annual registration fee shall be one thousand
dollars payable to the division as of the first day of July
of each year. The division may establish a biennial
registration arrangement, but in no case shall the
registration fee be payable for more than one year at a
time] At the time of filing an application for licensure,
the applicant shall pay a licensing fee, to be determined by
the director from time to time, not to exceed five thousand
dollars and a fee for each additional location where such
applicant conducts business, to be determined by the
director from time to time, not to exceed one thousand
dollars. Applicants who have not exceeded one hundred
active accounts at any point in the previous licensing year,
shall pay a licensing fee, to be determined by the director
from time to time, not to exceed one thousand dollars and a
fee for each additional location where such applicant
conducts business, to be determined by the director from

SB 1021 8
time to time, not to exceed one thousand dollars. The
licensing period shall run from July first to June
thirtieth. Thereafter, every licensee shall pay a like fee
on or before June thirtieth of each year. All license fees
paid pursuant to this section shall be credited to the
consumer licensing fund.
(3) [Registration] Application for licensure shall be
made on forms prepared by the director and shall contain the
following information:
(a) Name, business address, and telephone number of
100 the earned wage access services provider;
101 (b) Name and business address of corporate officers
102 and directors or principals or partners;
103 (c) A sworn statement by an appropriate officer,
104 principal, or partner of the earned wage access services
105 provider that:
106 a. The provider is financially capable of engaging in
107 the business of earned wage access services; and
108 b. If a corporation, that the corporation is
109 authorized to transact business in this state.
110 If any material change occurs in the information contained
111 in the [registration] license application form, a revised
112 statement shall be submitted to the director.
113 (4) A [certificate of registration] license shall be
114 issued by the director within thirty calendar days after the
115 date on which all [registration materials] required
116 licensing information has [have] been received by the
117 director and shall not be assignable or transferable, except
118 as approved by the director.

SB 1021 9
119 (5) Each [certificate of registration] license shall
120 remain in full force and effect until surrendered, revoked,
121 or suspended.
122 3. This section shall not apply to:
123 (1) A bank or savings and loan association whose
124 deposits or accounts are eligible for insurance by the
125 Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or a subsidiary of
126 such a bank or savings and loan association;
127 (2) A credit union doing business in this state; or
128 (3) A person authorized to make loans or extensions of
129 credit under the laws of this state or the United States,
130 who is subject to regulation and supervision by this state
131 or the United States.
132 4. Each provider shall:
133 (1) Develop and implement policies and procedures to
134 respond to questions raised by consumers and address
135 complaints from consumers in an expedient manner;
136 (2) Before entering into an agreement with a consumer
137 for the provision of earned wage access services, provide a
138 consumer with a written paper or electronic document, which
139 can be included as part of the contract to provide earned
140 wage access services and which meets all of the following
141 requirements:
142 (a) Informs the consumer of his or her rights under
143 the agreement; and
144 (b) Fully and clearly discloses all fees associated
145 with the earned wage access services;
146 (3) Inform the consumer of the fact of any material
147 changes to the terms and conditions of the earned wage
148 access services before implementing those changes for that
149 consumer;

SB 1021 10
150 (4) Provide proceeds to a consumer by any means
151 mutually agreed upon by the consumer and provider;
152 (5) Comply with all local, state, and federal privacy
153 and information security laws;
154 (6) In any case in which the provider will seek
155 repayment of outstanding proceeds, fees, or other payments,
156 including voluntary tips, gratuities, or other donations
157 from a consumer's account at a depository institution and
158 including via electronic funds transfer:
159 (a) Comply with applicable provisions of the federal
160 Electronic Funds Transfer Act and its implementing
161 regulations; and
162 (b) Reimburse the consumer for the full amount of any
163 overdraft or nonsufficient funds fees imposed on a consumer
164 by the consumer's depository institution that were caused by
165 the provider attempting to seek payment of any outstanding
166 proceeds, fees, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other
167 donations on a date before, or in an incorrect amount from,
168 the date or amount disclosed to the consumer.
169 The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply with
170 respect to payments of outstanding proceeds, fees, tips,
171 gratuities, or other donations incurred by a consumer
172 through fraudulent or other means; and
173 (7) If a provider solicits, charges, or receives a
174 tip, gratuity, or donation from a consumer:
175 (a) Clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer
176 immediately prior to each transaction that a tip, gratuity,
177 or donation amount may be zero and is voluntary;
178 (b) Clearly and conspicuously disclose in its service
179 contract with the consumer and elsewhere that tips,
180 gratuities, or donations are voluntary and that the offering

SB 1021 11
181 of earned wage access services, including the amount of the
182 proceeds a consumer is eligible to request and the frequency
183 with which proceeds are provided to a consumer, is not
184 contingent on whether the consumer pays any tip, gratuity,
185 or donation or on the size of any tip, gratuity, or donation;
186 (c) Refrain from misleading or deceiving consumers
187 about the voluntary nature of such tips, gratuities, or
188 donations; and
189 (d) Refrain from making representations that tips or
190 gratuities will benefit any specific, individual person.
191 5. A provider shall not:
192 (1) Share with an employer any fees, voluntary tips,
193 gratuities, or other donations that were received from or
194 charged to a consumer for earned wage access services;
195 (2) Charge interest for failure to repay outstanding
196 proceeds, fees, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other
197 donations;
198 (3) Report any information about the consumer
199 regarding the inability of the provider to be repaid
200 outstanding proceeds, fees, voluntary tips, gratuities, or
201 other donations to a consumer credit reporting agency or a
202 debt collector;
203 (4) Require a consumer's credit report or credit score
204 to determine a consumer's eligibility for earned wage access
205 services;
206 (5) Accept payment from a consumer of outstanding
207 proceeds, fees, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other
208 donations via credit card or charge card; or
209 (6) Compel or attempt to compel repayment by a
210 consumer of outstanding proceeds, fees, voluntary tips,
211 gratuities, or other donations through any of the following
212 means:

SB 1021 12
213 (a) A suit against the consumer in a court of
214 competent jurisdiction;
215 (b) Use of a third party to pursue collection from the
216 consumer on the provider's behalf; or
217 (c) Sale of outstanding amounts to a third-party
218 collector or debt buyer for collection from the consumer.
219 The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to
220 payments of outstanding proceeds, fees, tips, gratuities, or
221 other donations incurred by a consumer through fraudulent or
222 other means or preclude a provider from pursuing an employer
223 for breach of its contractual obligations to the provider.
224 6. For purposes of the laws of this state:
225 (1) Earned wage access services offered and provided
226 by a registered provider shall not be considered to be any
227 of the following:
228 (a) A violation of or noncompliance with the laws
229 governing the sale or assignment of or an order for earned
230 but unpaid income;
231 (b) A loan or other form of credit, and the provider
232 shall not be considered a creditor or a lender;
233 (c) Money transmission, and the provider shall not be
234 considered a money transmitter;
235 (2) Fees, voluntary tips, gratuities, or other
236 donations shall not be considered interest or finance
237 charges.
238 7. The director, or his or her duly authorized
239 representative, may make such investigation as is deemed
240 necessary and, to the extent necessary for this purpose, may
241 examine the registrant or any other person having personal
242 knowledge of the matters under investigation, and shall have

SB 1021 13
243 the power to compel the production of all relevant books,
244 records, accounts, and documents by registrants.
245 8. (1) An earned wage access services provider shall
246 maintain records of its earned wage access services
247 transactions and shall preserve its records for at least two
248 years after the final date on which it provides proceeds to
249 a consumer.
250 (2) Records required by this section may be maintained
251 electronically.
252 9. The division may promulgate rules as may be
253 necessary for the administration of this section. Any rule
254 or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
255 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
256 this section shall become effective only if it complies with
257 and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
258 if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
259 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
260 the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
261 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
262 are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
263 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
264 August 28, 2023, shall be invalid and void.
265 10. (1) Any provider registered pursuant to this
266 section who fails, refuses, or neglects to comply with the
267 provisions of this section or commits any criminal act may
268 have its [registration] license suspended or revoked by the
269 director, after a hearing before the director on an order of
270 the director to show cause why such order of suspension or
271 revocation should not be entered specifying the grounds
272 therefor, which shall be served on the registrant at least
273 ten days prior to the hearing.

SB 1021 14
274 (2) Whenever it shall appear to the director that any
275 provider registered pursuant to this section is failing,
276 refusing, or neglecting to make a good faith effort to
277 comply with the provisions of this section, the director may
278 issue an order to cease and desist, which order may be
279 enforceable by a civil penalty of not more than one thousand
280 dollars per day for each day that the neglect, failure, or
281 refusal shall continue. The penalty shall be assessed and
282 collected by the director. In determining the amount of the
283 penalty, the director shall take into account the
284 appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity
285 of the violation, the history of previous violations, and
286 such other matters as justice may require.
287 11. All revenues collected by or paid to the director
288 pursuant to this section shall be forwarded immediately to
289 the director of revenue, who shall deposit them in the
290 [division of finance] consumer licensing fund.
291 12. Any earned wage access services provider knowingly
292 and willfully violating the provisions of this section shall
293 be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
294 13. If there is a conflict between the provisions of
295 this section and any other state statute, the provisions of
296 this section shall control.
364.020. Unless otherwise clearly indicated by the
context, when used in this chapter, the following terms mean:
(1) "Director", the office of the director of the
division of finance.
(2) "Financing institution", a person engaged in the
business of purchasing or otherwise acquiring retail time
contracts or accounts under retail charge agreements from
one or more sellers. The term includes but is not limited
to a bank, trust company, loan and investment company,

SB 1021 15
savings and loan association, licensed sales finance company
as the same is defined in the Missouri motor vehicle time
sales law (chapter 365) or [registrant] licensee under
sections 367.100 to 367.200, if so engaged; but does not
include a distributor insofar as he takes assignments of
retail installment purchase contracts covering goods which
were distributed by him to the retailer thereof.
(3) "Person", an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, and any other group however organized. Words
used herein shall have the same meaning as is ascribed to
such words in the Missouri retail credit sales law (sections
408.250 to 408.370).
364.030. 1. No person shall engage in the business of
a financing institution in this state without a license
therefor as provided in this chapter; except, however, that
no bank, trust company, loan and investment company,
licensed sales finance company, [registrant] licensee under
the provisions of sections 367.100 to 367.200, or person who
makes only occasional purchases of retail time contracts or
accounts under retail charge agreements and which purchases
are not being made in the course of repeated or successive
purchase of retail installment contracts from the same
seller, shall be required to obtain a license under this
chapter but shall comply with all the laws of this state
applicable to the conduct and operation of a financing
institution.
2. [The application for the license shall be in
writing, under oath and in the form prescribed by the
director. The application shall contain the name of the
applicant; date of incorporation, if incorporated; the
address where the business is or is to be conducted and
similar information as to any branch office of the

SB 1021 16
applicant; the name and resident address of the owner or
partners or, if a corporation or association, of the
directors, trustees and principal officers, and other
pertinent information as the director may require] The
application for the license shall be in writing, under oath
and in the form prescribed by the director. At the time of
filing an application for licensure, the applicant shall pay
a licensing fee, to be determined by the director from time
to time, not to exceed five thousand dollars and a fee for
each additional location where such applicant conducts
business, to be determined by the director from time to
time, not to exceed one thousand dollars. Applicants who
have not exceeded one hundred active accounts at any point
in the previous licensing year, shall pay a licensing fee,
to be determined by the director from time to time, not to
exceed one thousand dollars and a fee for each additional
location where such applicant conducts business, to be
determined by the director from time to time, not to exceed
one thousand dollars. The licensing period shall run from
January first to December thirty-first. Thereafter, every
licensee shall pay a like fee on or before December thirty-
first of each year. All license fees paid pursuant to this
section shall be credited to the consumer licensing fund.
3. [The license fee for each calendar year or part
thereof shall be the sum of six hundred dollars for each
place of business of the licensee in this state which shall
be paid into the general revenue fund. The director may
establish a biennial licensing arrangement but in no case
shall the fees be payable for more than one year at a time.
4.] Each license shall specify the location of the
office or branch and must be conspicuously displayed
therein. In case the location is changed, the director

SB 1021 17
shall either endorse the change of location of the license
or mail the licensee a certificate to that effect, without
charge.
[5. Upon the filing of an application, and the payment
of the fee, the director shall issue a license to the
applicant to engage in the business of a financing
institution under and in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter for a period which shall expire the last day of
December next following the date of its issuance. The
license shall not be transferable or assignable. No
licensee shall transact any business provided for by this
chapter under any other name.]
364.105. 1. No person shall engage in the business of
a premium finance company in this state without [first
registering as] a premium finance company [with] license
issued by the director.
2. [The annual registration fee shall be six hundred
dollars payable to the director as of the first day of July
of each year. The director may establish a biennial
licensing arrangement but in no case shall the fees be
payable for more than one year at a time] At the time of
filing an application for licensure, the applicant shall pay
a licensing fee, to be determined by the director from time
to time, not to exceed five thousand dollars and a fee for
each additional location where such applicant conducts
business, to be determined by the director from time to
time, not to exceed one thousand dollars. Applicants who
have not exceeded one hundred active accounts at any point
in the previous licensing year shall pay a licensing fee, to
be determined by the director from time to time, not to
exceed one thousand dollars and a fee for each additional
location where such applicant conducts business, to be

SB 1021 18
determined by the director from time to time, not to exceed
one thousand dollars. The licensing period shall run from
July first to June thirtieth. Thereafter, every licensee
shall pay a like fee on or before June thirtieth of each
year. All license fees paid pursuant to this section shall
be credited to the consumer licensing fund.
3. [Registration] Applications for licensure shall be
made on forms prepared by the director and shall contain the
following information:
(1) Name, business address and telephone number of the
premium finance company;
(2) Name and business address of corporate officers
and directors or principals or partners;
(3) A sworn statement by an appropriate officer,
principal or partner of the premium finance company that:
(a) The premium finance company is financially capable
to engage in the business of insurance premium financing; and
(b) If a corporation, that the corporation is
authorized to transact business in this state;
(4) If any material change occurs in the information
contained in the [registration] application for licensure
form, a revised statement shall be submitted to the director
accompanied by an additional fee of three hundred dollars.
365.030. 1. No person shall engage in the business of
a sales finance company in this state without a license as
provided in this chapter; except, that no bank, trust
company, savings and loan association, loan and investment
company or registrant under the provisions of sections
367.100 to 367.200 authorized to do business in this state
is required to obtain a license under this chapter but shall
comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter.

SB 1021 19
2. The application for the license shall be in
writing, under oath and in the form prescribed by the
director. The application shall contain the name of the
applicant; date of incorporation, if incorporated; the
address where the business is or is to be conducted and
similar information as to any branch office of the
applicant; the name and resident address of the owner or
partners or, if a corporation or association, of the
directors, trustees and principal officers, and such other
pertinent information as the director may require.
3. [The license fee for each calendar year or part
thereof shall be the sum of six hundred dollars for each
place of business of the licensee in this state. The
director may establish a biennial licensing arrangement but
in no case shall the fees be payable for more than one year
at a time] At the time of filing an application for
licensure, the applicant shall pay a licensing fee, to be
determined by the director from time to time, not to exceed
five thousand dollars and a fee for each additional location
where such applicant conducts business, to be determined by
the director from time to time, not to exceed one thousand
dollars. Applicants who have not exceeded one hundred
active accounts at any point in the previous licensing year,
shall pay a licensing fee, to be determined by the director
from time to time, not to exceed one thousand dollars and a
fee for each additional location where such applicant
conducts business, to be determined by the director from
time to time, not to exceed one thousand dollars. The
licensing period shall run from January first to December
thirty-first. Thereafter, every licensee shall pay a like
fee on or before December thirty-first of each year. All

SB 1021 20
license fees paid pursuant to this section shall be credited
to the consumer licensing fund.
4. Each license shall specify the location of the
office or branch and must be conspicuously displayed there.
In case the location is changed, the director shall either
endorse the change of location on the license or mail the
licensee a certificate to that effect, without charge.
[5. Upon the filing of the application, and the
payment of the fee, the director shall issue a license to
the applicant to engage in the business of a sales finance
company under and in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter for a period which shall expire the last day of
December next following the date of its issuance. The
license shall not be transferable or assignable. No
licensee shall transact any business provided for by this
chapter under any other name.]
367.110. No lender shall engage in the business of
making consumer credit loans as herein defined in this state
of money, credit, goods or things in action without first
having obtained a [certificate of registration] license from
the director as provided in sections 367.100 to 367.200.
Application for a license shall be in writing in the form
prescribed by the director.
367.140. 1. [Every lender shall, at the time of
filing application for certificate of registration as
provided in section 367.120 hereof, pay the sum of six
hundred dollars as an annual registration fee for the period
ending the thirtieth day of June next following the date of
payment and in full payment of all expenses for
investigations, examinations and for the administration of
sections 367.100 to 367.200, except as provided in section
367.160, and thereafter a like fee shall be paid on or

SB 1021 21
before June thirtieth of each year; provided, that if a
lender is supervised by the commissioner of finance under
any other law, the charges for examination and supervision
required to be paid under said law shall be in lieu of the
annual fee for registration and examination required under
this section. The fee shall be made payable to the director
of revenue. If the initial registration fee for any
certificate of registration is for a period of less than
twelve months, the registration fee shall be prorated
according to the number of months that said period shall
run. The director may establish a biennial licensing
arrangement but in no case shall the fees be payable for
more than one year at a time] At the time of filing an
application for licensure, the applicant shall pay a
licensing fee, to be determined by the director from time to
time, not to exceed five thousand dollars and a fee for each
additional location where such applicant conducts business,
to be determined by the director from time to time, not to
exceed one thousand dollars. Applicants who have not
exceeded one hundred active accounts at any point in the
previous licensing year, shall pay a licensing fee, to be
determined by the director from time to time, not to exceed
one thousand dollars and a fee for each additional location
where such applicant conducts business, to be determined by
the director from time to time, not to exceed one thousand
dollars. The licensing period shall run from July first to
June thirtieth. Thereafter, every licensee shall pay a like
fee on or before June thirtieth of each year. All license
fees paid pursuant to this section shall be credited to the
consumer licensing fund.
2. Upon receipt of such fee and application for
[registration, and provided the bond, if required by the

SB 1021 22
director,] licensure has been filed, the director shall
issue to the lender a [certificate] license containing the
lender's name and address and reciting that such lender is
duly and properly [registered] licensed to conduct the
supervised business. The lender shall keep this certificate
of registration posted in a conspicuous place at the place
of business recited in the registration certificate. Where
the lender engages in the supervised business at or from
more than one office or place of business, such lender shall
obtain a separate certificate of registration for each such
office or place of business.
3. [Certificates of registration] Licenses shall not
be assignable or transferable except that the lender named
in any such certificate may obtain a change of address of
the place of business therein set forth. Each [certificate
of registration] license shall remain in full force and
effect until surrendered, revoked, or suspended as herein
provided.
367.160. The director, his deputies and examiners
shall have full power and authority at any time and as often
as reasonably necessary to investigate or examine the
supervised business, affairs and loans made in the
supervised business of any [registered] licensed lender and
of every person, firm, partnership and corporation making
loans who the director has reasonable grounds to believe is
subject to and violating the provisions of sections 367.100
to 367.200, for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not
the lender, or such person, firm, partnership or corporation
is complying with the provisions of sections 367.100 to
367.200 and the laws of Missouri relating to consumer credit
loans or assignment or sale of wages or salary or other
compensation. In connection with any such investigation or

SB 1021 23
examination the director and his representatives shall have
free and immediate access to the lender's place or places of
business and his or its books and records and shall have the
right and power to examine under oath all persons whomsoever
whose testimony may be required relative to the affairs and
business of the particular lender. Whenever it is necessary
to examine the business and loans of a [registered] licensed
lender more than once a year or of any other lender at any
time, then the lender shall be chargeable with and be
required to pay the necessary cost and expenses thereof[,
including the actual travel expenses and a per diem of one
hundred dollars for each examining official while engaged in
travel to and from the place of such examination and during
the period required for such examination]. Whenever any
lender is subject to examination by or required to make
reports to municipal officers under city ordinances
regulating the supervised business, such examinations or
reports shall be in lieu of the examinations and reports
required by the provisions of sections 367.100 to 367.200.
367.170. The director is authorized and empowered to
make such general regulations as may be necessary for the
enforcement of sections 367.100 to 367.200 and shall issue
regulations providing and governing the types and limits of
insurance and the issuance of policies which may be sold in
connection with consumer credit loans. The cost of any
insurance shall not exceed the standard rates and the
insurance shall be obtained from an insurance company duly
authorized to conduct business in this state and the
[registrant] licensee, or any of its employees, may be
licensed as an insurance agent. Insurance premiums shall
not be considered as interest, service charges or fees in
connection with any loan. Each such regulation shall be

SB 1021 24
consistent with sections 367.100 to 367.200 and shall be
referenced to the specific provision of sections 367.100 to
367.200 which is to be enforced by it. Nothing in this
section shall alter or amend the statutes of this state
relating to insurance or affect the powers of the director
of the department of commerce and insurance under statutes
relating to credit life insurance and credit accident and
health insurance.
367.190. In the event any lender fails, refuses, or
neglects to comply with the provisions of sections 367.100
to 367.200, or of any laws of the state of Missouri relating
to consumer credit loans or assignment or sale of wages, or
salaries or other compensation, his or its [certificate of
registration for the place of business at which the
violation occurred,] license may be suspended or revoked by
order of the director after a hearing before said director
on any order to show cause why such order of suspension or
revocation should not be entered specifying the grounds
therefor which shall be served on the particular lender at
least ten days prior to the hearing. Such action shall not
affect any rights or charter powers which any state bank,
state trust company or national banking association has by
virtue of any other law. Review may be had of any such
order made and entered by the director in the manner
provided by law.
367.509. 1. A title loan license applicant must have
and maintain capital of at least seventy-five thousand
dollars at all times.
2. The license application shall be in writing, under
oath and in the form prescribed by the director. The
application shall contain the name of the applicant, date of
formation if a business entity, the address of each title

SB 1021 25
loan office operated or sought to be operated, the name and
residential address of the owner, partners, directors,
trustees and principal officers, and such other pertinent
information as the director may require. A corporate surety
bond in the principal sum of twenty thousand dollars per
location shall accompany each license application. The bond
shall be in a form satisfactory to the director and shall be
issued by a bonding company or insurance company authorized
to do business in this state in order to ensure the faithful
performance of the obligations of the applicant and the
applicant's agents and subagents in connection with title
loan activities. An applicant or licensee may, in lieu of
filing any bond required pursuant to this section, provide
the director with an irrevocable letter of credit as defined
in section 400.5-103 in the amount of twenty thousand
dollars per location, issued by any bank, trust company,
savings and loan or credit union operating in Missouri in a
form acceptable to the director.
3. [Every person applying for a title loan license
shall pay one thousand dollars as an investigation fee.
Applicants for additional title lending licenses shall pay
one thousand dollars per additional location as an
investigation fee. The lender shall, beginning with the
first license renewal, pay annually to the director a fee of
one thousand dollars for each licensed location] At the time
of filing an application for licensure, the applicant shall
pay a licensing fee, to be determined by the director from
time to time, not to exceed five thousand dollars and a fee
for each additional location where such applicant conducts
business, to be determined by the director from time to
time, not to exceed one thousand dollars. Applicants who
have not exceeded one hundred active accounts at any point

SB 1021 26
in the previous licensing year, shall pay a licensing fee,
to be determined by the director from time to time, not to
exceed one thousand dollars and a fee for each additional
location where such applicant conducts business, to be
determined by the director from time to time, not to exceed
one thousand dollars. The licensing period shall run from
January first to December thirty-first. Thereafter, every
licensee shall pay a like fee on or before December thirty-
first of each year. All license fees paid pursuant to this
section shall be credited to the consumer licensing fund.
4. Each license shall specify the location of the
title loan office and shall be conspicuously displayed
therein. Before any title lending office may relocate, the
director shall approve such relocation by mailing the
licensee a new license to that effect, without charge.
[5. Upon the filing of the application, and the
payment of the fee, by a person eligible to apply for a
title loan license, the director shall issue a license to
engage in the title loan business in accordance with
sections 367.500 to 367.533. The licensing year shall
commence on January first and end the following December
thirty-first. The director may establish a biennial
licensing arrangement but in no case shall the fees be
payable for more than one year at a time. Each license
shall be uniquely numbered and shall not be transferable or
assignable.]
407.640. 1. A credit services organization shall file
a registration statement with the director of finance before
conducting business in this state. The registration
statement must contain:
(1) The name and address of the credit services
organization; and

SB 1021 27
(2) The name and address of any person who directly or
indirectly owns or controls ten percent or more of the
outstanding shares of stock in the credit services
organization.
2. The registration statement must also contain either:
(1) A full and complete disclosure of any litigation
or unresolved complaint filed by or with a governmental
authority of this state relating to the operation of the
credit services organization; or
(2) A notarized statement that states that there has
been no litigation or unresolved complaint filed by or with
a governmental authority of this state relating to the
operation of the credit services organization.
3. The credit services organization shall update the
statement not later than the ninetieth day after the date on
which a change in the information required in the statement
occurs.
4. Each credit services organization registering under
this section shall maintain a copy of the registration
statement in the office of the credit services
organization. The credit services organization shall allow
a buyer to inspect the registration statement on request.
5. The director of finance may charge each credit
services organization that files a registration statement
with the director of finance a reasonable fee not to exceed
[four hundred] one thousand dollars to cover the cost of
filing. The director of finance may not require a credit
services organization to provide information other than that
provided in the registration statement as part of the
registration process.
408.500. 1. Lenders, other than banks, trust
companies, credit unions, savings banks and savings and loan

SB 1021 28
companies, in the business of making unsecured loans of five
hundred dollars or less shall obtain a license from the
director of the division of finance. [An annual license fee
of six hundred dollars per location shall be required. The
license year shall commence on January first each year and
the license fee may be prorated for expired months. The
director may establish a biennial licensing arrangement but
in no case shall the fees be payable for more than one year
at a time] At the time of filing an application for
licensure, the applicant shall pay a licensing fee, to be
determined by the director from time to time, not to exceed
five thousand dollars and a fee for each additional location
where such applicant conducts business, to be determined by
the director from time to time, not to exceed one thousand
dollars. Applicants who have not exceeded one hundred
active accounts at any point in the previous licensing year,
shall pay a licensing fee, to be determined by the director
from time to time, not to exceed one thousand dollars and a
fee for each additional location where such applicant
conducts business, to be determined by the director from
time to time, not to exceed one thousand dollars. The
licensing period shall run from January first to December
thirty-first. Thereafter, every licensee shall pay a like
fee on or before December thirty-first of each year. All
license fees paid pursuant to this section shall be credited
to the consumer licensing fund. The provisions of this
section shall not apply to pawnbroker loans, consumer credit
loans as authorized under chapter 367, nor to a check
accepted and deposited or cashed by the payee business on
the same or the following business day. The disclosures
required by the federal Truth in Lending Act and regulation
Z shall be provided on any loan, renewal or extension made

SB 1021 29
pursuant to this section and the loan, renewal or extension
documents shall be signed by the borrower.
2. Entities making loans pursuant to this section
shall contract for and receive simple interest and fees in
accordance with sections 408.100 and 408.140. Any contract
evidencing any fee or charge of any kind whatsoever, except
for bona fide clerical errors, in violation of this section
shall be void. Any person, firm or corporation who receives
or imposes a fee or charge in violation of this section
shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
3. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, cost
of collection expenses, which include court costs and
reasonable attorneys fees, awarded by the court in suit to
recover on a bad check or breach of contract shall not be
considered as a fee or charge for purposes of this section.
4. Lenders licensed pursuant to this section shall
conspicuously post in the lobby of the office, in at least
fourteen-point bold type, the maximum annual percentage
rates such licensee is currently charging and the statement:
NOTICE:
This lender offers short-term loans. Please read and
understand the terms of the loan agreement before signing.
5. The lender shall provide the borrower with a notice
in substantially the following form set forth in at least
ten-point bold type, and receipt thereof shall be
acknowledged by signature of the borrower:
(1) This lender offers short-term loans.
Please read and understand the terms of the loan
agreement before signing.

SB 1021 30
(2) You may cancel this loan without costs
by returning the full principal balance to the
lender by the close of the lender's next full
business day.
6. The lender shall renew the loan upon the borrower's
written request and the payment of any interest and fees due
at the time of such renewal; however, upon the first renewal
of the loan agreement, and each subsequent renewal
thereafter, the borrower shall reduce the principal amount
of the loan by not less than five percent of the original
amount of the loan until such loan is paid in full.
However, no loan may be renewed more than six times.
7. When making or negotiating loans, a licensee shall
consider the financial ability of the borrower to reasonably
repay the loan in the time and manner specified in the loan
contract. All records shall be retained at least two years.
8. A licensee who ceases business pursuant to this
section must notify the director to request an examination
of all records within ten business days prior to cessation.
All records must be retained at least two years.
9. Any lender licensed pursuant to this section who
fails, refuses or neglects to comply with the provisions of
this section, or any laws relating to consumer loans or
commits any criminal act may have its license suspended or
revoked by the director of finance after a hearing before
the director on an order of the director to show cause why
such order of suspension or revocation should not be entered
specifying the grounds therefor which shall be served on the
licensee at least ten days prior to the hearing.
10. Whenever it shall appear to the director that any
lender licensed pursuant to this section is failing,
refusing or neglecting to make a good faith effort to comply

SB 1021 31
with the provisions of this section, or any laws relating to
consumer loans, the director may issue an order to cease and
desist which order may be enforceable by a civil penalty of
not more than one thousand dollars per day for each day that
100 the neglect, failure or refusal shall continue. The penalty
101 shall be assessed and collected by the director. In
102 determining the amount of the penalty, the director shall
103 take into account the appropriateness of the penalty with
104 respect to the gravity of the violation, the history of
105 previous violations, and such other matters as justice may
106 require.
107 11. The director may promulgate rules as may be
108 necessary for the administration of licensing lenders in the
109 business of making unsecured loans of five hundred dollars
110 or less. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
111 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
112 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
113 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
114 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
115 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
116 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
117 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
118 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
119 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
120 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
121 2026, shall be invalid and void.
436.570. 1. A consumer legal funding company shall
not engage in the business of consumer legal funding in this
state unless it has first obtained a license from the
division of finance.

SB 1021 32
2. A consumer legal funding company's initial or
renewal license application shall be in writing, made under
oath, and on a form provided by the director.
3. [Every consumer legal funding company, at the time
of filing a license application, shall pay the sum of five
hundred fifty dollars for the period ending the thirtieth
day of June next following the date of payment; thereafter,
a like fee shall be paid on or before June thirtieth of each
year and shall be credited to the division of finance fund
established under section 361.170] At the time of filing an
application for licensure, the applicant shall pay a
licensing fee, to be determined by the director from time to
time, not to exceed five thousand dollars and a fee for each
additional location where such applicant conducts business,
to be determined by the director from time to time, not to
exceed one thousand dollars. Applicants who have not
exceeded one hundred active accounts at any point in the
previous licensing year, shall pay a licensing fee, to be
determined by the director from time to time, not to exceed
one thousand dollars and a fee for each additional location
where such applicant conducts business, to be determined by
the director from time to time, not to exceed one thousand
dollars. The licensing period shall run from July first to
June thirtieth. Thereafter, every licensee shall pay a like
fee on or before June thirtieth of each year. All license
fees paid pursuant to this section shall be credited to the
consumer licensing fund.
4. A consumer legal funding license shall not be
issued unless the division of finance, upon investigation,
finds that the character and fitness of the applicant
company, and of the officers and directors thereof, are such
as to warrant belief that the business shall operate

SB 1021 33
honestly and fairly within the purposes of sections 436.550
to 436.572.
5. Every applicant shall also, at the time of filing
such application, file a bond satisfactory to the division
of finance in an amount not to exceed fifty thousand
dollars. The bond shall provide that the applicant shall
faithfully conform to and abide by the provisions of
sections 436.550 to 436.572, to all rules lawfully made by
the director under sections 436.550 to 436.572, and the bond
shall act as a surety for any person or the state for any
and all amount of moneys that may become due or owing from
the applicant under and by virtue of sections 436.550 to
436.572, which shall include the result of any action that
occurred while the bond was in place for the applicable
period of limitations under statute and so long as the bond
is not exhausted by valid claims.
6. If an action is commenced on a licensee's bond, the
director may require the filing of a new bond. Immediately
upon any recovery on the bond, the licensee shall file a new
bond.
7. To ensure the effective supervision and enforcement
of sections 436.550 to 436.572, the director may, under
chapter 536:
(1) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to
renew a license for a violation of sections 436.550 to
436.572, rules issued under sections 436.550 to 436.572, or
order or directive entered under sections 436.550 to 436.572;
(2) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to
renew a license if an applicant or licensee fails at any
time to meet the requirements of sections 436.550 to
436.572, or withholds information or makes a material

SB 1021 34
misstatement in an application for a license or renewal of a
license;
(3) Order restitution against persons subject to
sections 436.550 to 436.572 for violations of sections
436.550 to 436.572; and
(4) Order or direct such other affirmative action as
the director deems necessary.
8. Any letter issued by the director and declaring
grounds for denying or declining to grant or renew a license
may be appealed to the circuit court of Cole County. All
other matters presenting a contested case involving a
licensee may be heard by the director under chapter 536.
9. Notwithstanding the prior approval requirement of
subsection 1 of this section, a consumer legal funding
company that has applied with the division of finance
between August 28, 2023, or when the division of finance has
made applications available to the public, whichever is
later, and six months thereafter may engage in consumer
legal funding while the license application of the company
or an affiliate of the company is awaiting approval by the
division of finance and until such time as the applicant has
pursued all appellate remedies and procedures for any denial
of such application. All funding contracts in effect prior
to August 28, 2023, are not subject to the terms of sections
436.550 to 436.572.
10. If it appears to the director that any consumer
legal funding company is failing, refusing, or neglecting to
make a good faith effort to comply with the provisions of
sections 436.550 to 436.572, or any laws or rules relating
to consumer legal funding, the director may issue an order
to cease and desist, which may be enforceable by a civil
penalty of not more than one thousand dollars per day for

SB 1021 35
100 each day that the neglect, failure, or refusal continues.
101 The penalty shall be assessed and collected by the
102 director. In determining the amount of the penalty, the
103 director shall take into account the appropriateness of the
104 penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation, any
105 history of previous violations, and any other matters
106 justice may require.
107 11. If any consumer legal funding company fails,
108 refuses, or neglects to comply with the provisions of
109 sections 436.550 to 436.572, or of any laws or rules
110 relating to consumer legal funding, its license may be
111 suspended or revoked by order of the director after a
112 hearing before said director on any order to show cause why
113 such order of suspension or revocation should not be entered
114 and that specifies the grounds therefor. Such an order
115 shall be served on the particular consumer legal funding
116 company at least ten days prior to the hearing. Any order
117 made and entered by the director may be appealed to the
118 circuit court of Cole County.
119 12. (1) The division shall conduct an examination of
120 each consumer funding company at least once every twenty-
121 four months and at such other times as the director may
122 determine.
123 (2) For any such investigation or examination, the
124 director and his or her representatives shall have free and
125 immediate access to the place or places of business and the
126 books and records, and shall have the authority to place
127 under oath all persons whose testimony may be required
128 relative to the affairs and business of the consumer legal
129 funding company.
130 (3) The director may also make such special
131 investigations or examination as the director deems

SB 1021 36
132 necessary to determine whether any consumer legal funding
133 company has violated any of the provisions of sections
134 436.550 to 436.572 or rules promulgated thereunder, and the
135 director may assess the reasonable costs of any
136 investigation or examination incurred by the division to the
137 company.
138 13. The division of finance shall have the authority
139 to promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of sections
140 436.550 to 436.572. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
141 term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
142 the authority delegated in this section shall become
143 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
144 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
145 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
146 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
147 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
148 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
149 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
150 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
151 2023, shall be invalid and void.
[367.120. Application for a certificate of
registration shall be in writing in the form
prescribed by the director. No certificate of
registration is required until thirty days after
sections 367.100 to 367.200 become effective,
during which period such application may be
made.]
[367.130. The director may require the
lender to file with the director a bond in the
principal amount of one thousand dollars at the
time of filing the application for a certificate
of registration hereunder, or at such later time
as the director deems necessary for the purposes
of sections 367.100 to 367.200. The lender
shall be the obligor, and the surety shall be

SB 1021 37
approved by the director. The bond shall run to
the state of Missouri for the use of the state
or any person or persons who may have a cause of
action against the lender-obligor arising out of
the supervised business. The condition of the
bond shall be that the lender-obligor will
conform to and abide by the provisions of
sections 367.100 to 367.200 and the laws of the
state of Missouri relating to consumer credit
loans, and the assignment or sale of wages,
salaries, or other compensation, and will pay to
the state and to any person any and all moneys
that may become due under sections 367.100 to
367.200 or under any transaction which is a part
of the supervised business. If in the opinion
of the director the bond shall at any time
appear to be insecure or exhausted or otherwise
doubtful an additional bond in the principal sum
of not more than one thousand dollars in form
and with surety satisfactory to the director,
shall be filed within fifteen days after notice
of the requirement thereof be given to the
lender by the director.]
✓